Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-518
Hemp Promotion Fund; established; termination.

The Hemp Promotion Fund is established. The fund terminates on January 1, 2025, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund on such date or as soon thereafter as administratively possible to the Noxious Weed Cash Fund.

Laws 2019, LB657, § 18;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 6.